apertium-es-ast.ast.dix
	<pardef n="esquimal__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="at/ún__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ún</l>
          <r>ún<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unes</l>
          <r>ún<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ablan/éu__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>éu</l>
          <r>éu<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eos</l>
          <r>éu<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dependient/e__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="an/ís__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ís</l>
          <r>ís<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ises</l>
          <r>ís<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="abog/áu__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>áu</l>
          <r>áu<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ada</l>
          <r>áu<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aos</l>
          <r>áu<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aes</l>
          <r>áu<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="autob/ús__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uses</l>
          <r>ús<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ús</l>
          <r>ús<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mes__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="alde/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="adi/ós__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oses</l>
          <r>ós<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ós</l>
          <r>ós<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="alfére/z__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>z</l>
          <r>z<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ces</l>
          <r>z<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="atardec/ida__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ida</l>
          <r>ida<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>íes</l>
          <r>ida<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="aboques__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="iverna/da__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>da</l>
          <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aes</l>
          <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
	<pardef n="im/axe__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>axe</l>
          <r>axe<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>áxenes</l>
          <r>axe<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ag/ua__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ua</l>
          <r>ua<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ües</l>
          <r>ua<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!-- Preposiciones -->
    <pardef n="según__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

	<pardef n="/de__pr">
	 <e r="LR">
	   <p>
		<l>de</l>
		<r>de<s n="pr"/></r>
	   </p>
	 </e>
	 <e r="RL">
	   <p>
		<l><a/>de</l>
		<r>de<s n="pr"/></r>
	   </p>
	 </e>
	</pardef>

    <pardef n="/con__pr">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>con</l>
          <r>con<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>con</l>
          <r>con<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>col</l>
          <r>con<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cola</l>
          <r>con<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>colo</l>
          <r>con<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>colos</l>
          <r>con<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>coles</l>
          <r>con<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/per__pr">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>per</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>per</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pel</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pela</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pelo</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pelos</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>peles</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="con"><i/><par n="/con__pr"/></e>
    <e r="LR" lm="co"><i>co</i><par n="según__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="de"><i/><par n="/de__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="durante"><i>durante</i><par n="según__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="según"><i>según</i><par n="según__pr"/></e>
    <e><i>at</i><par n="at/ún__n"/></e>
    <e><i>bativol</i><par n="ablan/éu__n"/></e>
    <e><i>bornaces</i><par n="aboques__n"/></e>
    <e><i>bóved</i><par n="alde/a__n"/></e>
    <e><i>burb</i><par n="autob/ús__n"/></e>
    <e><i>calor</i><par n="mes__n"/></e>
    <e><i>capata</i><par n="alfére/z__n"/></e>
    <e><i>caramocu</i><par n="esquimal__n"/></e>
    <e><i>caric</i><par n="adi/ós__n"/></e>
    <e><i>carrapeta</i><par n="iverna/da__n"/></e>
    <e><i>casp</i><par n="atardec/ida__n"/></e>
    <e><i>cencerr</i><par n="ablan/éu__n"/></e>
    <e><i>ciclocr</i><par n="adi/ós__n"/></e>
    <e><i>cónsul</i><par n="esquimal__n"/></e>
    <e><i>converxenci</i><par n="alde/a__n"/></e>
    <e><i>cri</i><par n="abog/áu__n"/></e>
    <e><i>dependient</i><par n="dependient/e__n"/></e>
    <e><i>desig</i><par n="ag/ua__n"/></e>
    <e><i>dinguirindaines</i><par n="aboques__n"/></e>
    <e><i>ecl</i><par n="an/ís__n"/></e>
    <e><i>empix</i><par n="mes__n"/></e>
    <e><i>esparv</i><par n="alde/a__n"/></e>
    <e><i>estomaga</i><par n="iverna/da__n"/></e>
    <e><i>flisg</i><par n="ag/ua__n"/></e>
    <e><i>frañ</i><par n="atardec/ida__n"/></e>
    <e><i>fug</i><par n="abog/áu__n"/></e>
    <e><i>guardiacivil</i><par n="esquimal__n"/></e>
    <e><i>historiografí</i><par n="alde/a__n"/></e>
    <e><i>llimonal</i><par n="mes__n"/></e>
    <e><i>llimpiaparabr</i><par n="an/ís__n"/></e>
    <e><i>macatr</i><par n="autob/ús__n"/></e>
    <e><i>maxistr</i><par n="abog/áu__n"/></e>
    <e><i>motocr</i><par n="adi/ós__n"/></e>
    <e><i>nag</i><par n="ag/ua__n"/></e>
    <e><i>ob</i><par n="autob/ús__n"/></e>
    <e><i>parabr</i><par n="an/ís__n"/></e>
    <e><i>parigüeles</i><par n="aboques__n"/></e>
    <e><i>par</i><par n="ablan/éu__n"/></e>
    <e><i>pend</i><par n="autob/ús__n"/></e>
    <e><i>playa</i><par n="iverna/da__n"/></e>
    <e><i>pollar</i><par n="mes__n"/></e>
    <e><i>rapa</i><par n="alfére/z__n"/></e>
    <e><i>renac</i><par n="atardec/ida__n"/></e>
    <e><i>tamar</i><par n="an/ís__n"/></e>
    <e><i>unvi</i><par n="abog/áu__n"/></e>
    <e><i>ventid</i><par n="adi/ós__n"/></e>
    <e><i>vid</i><par n="ablan/éu__n"/></e>
    <e><i>xue</i><par n="alfére/z__n"/></e>
    <e><i>xuglar</i><par n="esquimal__n"/></e>
    <e r="LR" lm="p'"><p><l>p'</l><r>en</r></p><par n="según__pr"/></e>
<e>
<par n="paresq"/>
</e>
    <e lm="con"><i/><par n="/con__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="de"><i/><par n="/de__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="dende"><i>dende</i><par n="según__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="sin"><i>sin</i><par n="según__pr"/></e>
    <e><i>adensadur</i><par n="alde/a__n"/></e>
    <e><i>afux</i><par n="atardec/ida__n"/></e>
    <e><i>alfére</i><par n="alfére/z__n"/></e>
    <e><i>alicates</i><par n="aboques__n"/></e>
    <e><i>almorad</i><par n="autob/ús__n"/></e>
    <e><i>at</i><par n="at/ún__n"/></e>
    <e><i>aug</i><par n="ag/ua__n"/></e>
    <e><i>banduya</i><par n="iverna/da__n"/></e>
    <e><i>bardal</i><par n="mes__n"/></e>
    <e><i>benefici</i><par n="abog/áu__n"/></e>
    <e><i>cald</i><par n="ablan/éu__n"/></e>
    <e><i>capata</i><par n="alfére/z__n"/></e>
    <e><i>caric</i><par n="adi/ós__n"/></e>
    <e><i>car</i><par n="an/ís__n"/></e>
    <e><i>cay</i><par n="atardec/ida__n"/></e>
    <e><i>civil</i><par n="esquimal__n"/></e>
    <e><i>curueñ</i><par n="alde/a__n"/></e>
    <e><i>dependient</i><par n="dependient/e__n"/></e>
    <e><i>diput</i><par n="abog/áu__n"/></e>
    <e><i>entred</i><par n="adi/ós__n"/></e>
    <e><i>faquir</i><par n="esquimal__n"/></e>
    <e><i>ferresebes</i><par n="aboques__n"/></e>
    <e><i>frag</i><par n="ag/ua__n"/></e>
    <e><i>furgoneta</i><par n="iverna/da__n"/></e>
    <e><i>fusal</i><par n="mes__n"/></e>
    <e><i>gañ</i><par n="atardec/ida__n"/></e>
    <e><i>h.ax</i><par n="an/ís__n"/></e>
    <e><i>macatr</i><par n="autob/ús__n"/></e>
    <e><i>mant</i><par n="ablan/éu__n"/></e>
    <e><i>mariín</i><par n="alde/a__n"/></e>
    <e><i>pa</i><par n="an/ís__n"/></e>
    <e><i>parch</i><par n="an/ís__n"/></e>
    <e><i>pend</i><par n="autob/ús__n"/></e>
    <e><i>pirag</i><par n="ag/ua__n"/></e>
    <e><i>pisabalagares</i><par n="aboques__n"/></e>
    <e><i>provincial</i><par n="esquimal__n"/></e>
    <e><i>rapa</i><par n="alfére/z__n"/></e>
    <e><i>restall</i><par n="atardec/ida__n"/></e>
    <e><i>riata</i><par n="iverna/da__n"/></e>
    <e><i>secador</i><par n="mes__n"/></e>
    <e><i>semidi</i><par n="adi/ós__n"/></e>
    <e><i>terr</i><par n="ablan/éu__n"/></e>
    <e><i>titul</i><par n="abog/áu__n"/></e>
    <e><i>xue</i><par n="alfére/z__n"/></e>
<e>
<par n="paresq"/>
</e>
